languages/apertium-kaa/tests/nums.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../kaa.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../kaa.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] dat":
    "1<num><subst><dat>" : !!str "1ge"
    2<num><subst><dat> : "2-ge"
    3<num><subst><dat> : "3-ke"
    4<num><subst><dat> : "4-ke"
    5<num><subst><dat> : "5-ke"
    6<num><subst><dat> : "6-g'a"
    7<num><subst><dat> : "7-ge"
    8<num><subst><dat> : "8-ge"
    9<num><subst><dat> : "9-g'a"
    10<num><subst><dat> : "10-g'a"
    20<num><subst><dat> : "20-g'a"
    30<num><subst><dat> : "30-g'a"
    40<num><subst><dat> : "40-qa"
    50<num><subst><dat> : "50-ge"
    60<num><subst><dat> : "60-qa"
    70<num><subst><dat> : "70-ke"
    80<num><subst><dat> : "80-ge"
    90<num><subst><dat> : "90-g'a"
    100<num><subst><dat> : "100-ge"


 "[twol] acc":
    1<num><subst><dat> : "1-di"
    2<num><subst><dat> : "2-ni"
    3<num><subst><dat> : "3-ti"
    4<num><subst><dat> : "4-ti"
    5<num><subst><dat> : "5-ti"
    6<num><subst><dat> : "6-nı"
    7<num><subst><dat> : "7-ni"
    8<num><subst><dat> : "8-di"
    9<num><subst><dat> : "9-dı"
    10<num><subst><dat> : "10-dı"
    20<num><subst><dat> : "20-nı"
    30<num><subst><dat> : "30-dı"
    40<num><subst><dat> : "40-tı"
    50<num><subst><dat> : "50-di"
    60<num><subst><dat> : "60-tı"
    70<num><subst><dat> : "70-ti"
    80<num><subst><dat> : "80-di"
    90<num><subst><dat> : "90-dı"
    100<num><subst><dat> : "100-di"
